Hawaii statutes.
§651-122 Personal property not exempt.
No exemption for personal property authorized under section 651-121 shall apply
to attachment or execution issued upon a judgment recovered for the price of
such property, or upon a judgment of foreclosure of a security agreement or
other security instrument encumbering personal property or for taxes or fines
or any debt due the State. [L 1976, c 136, pt of §2; am L 1978, c 46, §12]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next